District of Columbia statutes.
2-1212.23

Grocery ambassador program.

The Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development shall designate a District employee as the grocery ambassador to assist retailers in building or renovating grocery stores in eligible areas by:

(1)

Providing research and data on eligible areas with insufficient grocery access;

(2)

Coordinating with all relevant District agencies and public utilities;

(3)

Providing assistance in obtaining and expediting regulatory procedures and approvals; and

(4)

Providing other assistance as needed.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-353, § 203, 58 DCR 746
This section is referenced in § 2-1212.33.